test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kyeli_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kyeli: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeḷi
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyeˊle
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc: kyeˊle
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuáḷán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeˊleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe: kyeˊlettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess: kyellin
    kyeli+N+Par: kyellid
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom: kyeˊleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen: [kuolij, kuoˊlij]
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com: kuoˊlijguin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuoˊlijttáá

  Noun - syeji: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    syeji+N+Sg+Nom: syej̣i
    syeji+N+Sg+Gen: syeˊje
    syeji+N+Sg+Acc: syeˊje
    syeji+N+Sg+Ill: suáj̣án
    syeji+N+Sg+Loc: syeˊjeest
    syeji+N+Sg+Com: suoijijn
    syeji+N+Sg+Abe: syeˊjettáá
    syeji+N+Ess: syeijin
    syeji+N+Par: syeijid
    syeji+N+Pl+Nom: syeˊjeh
    syeji+N+Pl+Gen: [suojij, suoˊjij]
    syeji+N+Pl+Acc: suojijd
    syeji+N+Pl+Ill: suoijijd
    syeji+N+Pl+Loc: suojijn
    syeji+N+Pl+Com: suoˊjijguin
    syeji+N+Pl+Abe: suoˊjijttáá

  Noun - leeji: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    leeji+N+Sg+Nom: leej̣i
    leeji+N+Sg+Gen: leje
    leeji+N+Sg+Acc: leje
    leeji+N+Sg+Ill: liäj̣án
    leeji+N+Sg+Loc: leejeest
    leeji+N+Sg+Com: leijijn
    leeji+N+Sg+Abe: lejettáá
    leeji+N+Ess: leeijin
    leeji+N+Par: leeijid
    leeji+N+Pl+Nom: lejeh
    leeji+N+Pl+Gen: [leejij, lejij]
    leeji+N+Pl+Acc: leejijd
    leeji+N+Pl+Ill: leijijd
    leeji+N+Pl+Loc: leejijn
    leeji+N+Pl+Com: lejijguin
    leeji+N+Pl+Abe: lejijttáá

  Noun - neeti: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    neeti+N+Sg+Nom: neeti
    neeti+N+Sg+Gen: neđe
    neeti+N+Sg+Acc: neđe
    neeti+N+Sg+Ill: niätán
    neeti+N+Sg+Loc: neeđeest
    neeti+N+Sg+Com: neeđijn
    neeti+N+Sg+Abe: neđettáá
    neeti+N+Ess: neettin
    neeti+N+Par: neettid
    neeti+N+Pl+Nom: neđeh
    neeti+N+Pl+Gen: [neeđij, neđij]
    neeti+N+Pl+Acc: neeđijd
    neeti+N+Pl+Ill: neeđijd
    neeti+N+Pl+Loc: neeđijn
    neeti+N+Pl+Com: neđijguin
    neeti+N+Pl+Abe: neđijttáá

  Noun - peeli: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    peeli+N+Sg+Nom: peeḷi
    peeli+N+Sg+Gen: pele
    peeli+N+Sg+Acc: pele
    peeli+N+Sg+Ill: piäḷán
    peeli+N+Sg+Loc: peeleest
    peeli+N+Sg+Com: peelijn
    peeli+N+Sg+Abe: pelettáá
    peeli+N+Ess: peellin
    peeli+N+Par: peellid
    peeli+N+Pl+Nom: peleh
    peeli+N+Pl+Gen: [peelij, pelij]
    peeli+N+Pl+Acc: peelijd
    peeli+N+Pl+Ill: peelijd
    peeli+N+Pl+Loc: peelijn
    peeli+N+Pl+Com: pelijguin
    peeli+N+Pl+Abe: pelijttáá

  Noun - meeri: # ok KYELI i-e-á-stems
    meeri+N+Sg+Nom: meeṛi
    meeri+N+Sg+Gen: mere
    meeri+N+Sg+Acc: mere
    meeri+N+Sg+Ill: miäṛán
    meeri+N+Sg+Loc: meereest
    meeri+N+Sg+Com: meerijn
    meeri+N+Sg+Abe: merettáá
    meeri+N+Ess: meerrin
    meeri+N+Par: meerrid
    meeri+N+Pl+Nom: mereh
    meeri+N+Pl+Gen: [meerij, merij]
    meeri+N+Pl+Acc: meerijd
    meeri+N+Pl+Ill: meerijd
    meeri+N+Pl+Loc: meerijn
    meeri+N+Pl+Com: merijguin
    meeri+N+Pl+Abe: merijttáá
